lexc/noun/enhuderek.lexc
!!!enhuoamely-> enhuderek.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§J§ §JP§  §k§
§VV§   §ooez23§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oeoez21§ §oooe2§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §oeoez24§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! mély és é-> e
! fazék, derék
!
LEXICON Noun
agyagfazék AddNoun;
agyagfazék:agyagfazek AddNoun2;
alumíniumfazék AddNoun;
alumíniumfazék:alumíniumfazek AddNoun2;
aranyfazék AddNoun;
aranyfazék:aranyfazek AddNoun2;
cserépfazék AddNoun;
cserépfazék:cserépfazek AddNoun2;
csőfazék AddNoun;
csőfazék:csőfazek AddNoun2;
darázsderék AddNoun;
darázsderék:darázsderek AddNoun2;
derék AddNoun;
derék:derek AddNoun2;
enyvesfazék AddNoun;
enyvesfazék:enyvesfazek AddNoun2;
faderék AddNoun;
faderék:faderek AddNoun2;
fazék AddNoun;
fazék:fazek AddNoun2;
félderék AddNoun;
félderék:félderek AddNoun2;
fütyülőfazék AddNoun;
fütyülőfazék:fütyülőfazek AddNoun2;
főzőfazék AddNoun;
főzőfazék:főzőfazek AddNoun2;
fűszeresfazék AddNoun;
fűszeresfazék:fűszeresfazek AddNoun2;
gyerekderék AddNoun;
gyerekderék:gyerekderek AddNoun2;
gyűlöletfazék AddNoun;
gyűlöletfazék:gyűlöletfazek AddNoun2;
hadderék AddNoun;
hadderék:hadderek AddNoun2;
hajóderék AddNoun;
hajóderék:hajóderek AddNoun2;
harcsaderék AddNoun;
harcsaderék:harcsaderek AddNoun2;
hordóderék AddNoun;
hordóderék:hordóderek AddNoun2;
húsfazék AddNoun;
húsfazék:húsfazek AddNoun2;
húslevesfazék AddNoun;
húslevesfazék:húslevesfazek AddNoun2;
húsosfazék AddNoun;
húsosfazék:húsosfazek AddNoun2;
kisfazék AddNoun;
kisfazék:kisfazek AddNoun2;
kocsiderék AddNoun;
kocsiderék:kocsiderek AddNoun2;
kuktafazék AddNoun;
kuktafazék:kuktafazek AddNoun2;
káposztafazék AddNoun;
káposztafazék:káposztafazek AddNoun2;
kőderék AddNoun;
kőderék:kőderek AddNoun2;
kőfazék AddNoun;
kőfazék:kőfazek AddNoun2;
levesesfazék AddNoun;
levesesfazék:levesesfazek AddNoun2;
liliomderék AddNoun;
liliomderék:liliomderek AddNoun2;
lugasfazék AddNoun;
lugasfazék:lugasfazek AddNoun2;
lóderék AddNoun;
lóderék:lóderek AddNoun2;
mosófazék AddNoun;
mosófazék:mosófazek AddNoun2;
nadrágderék AddNoun;
nadrágderék:nadrágderek AddNoun2;
nyárderék AddNoun;
nyárderék:nyárderek AddNoun2;
olvasztófazék AddNoun;
olvasztófazék:olvasztófazek AddNoun2;
pillérderék AddNoun;
pillérderék:pillérderek AddNoun2;
pléhfazék AddNoun;
pléhfazék:pléhfazek AddNoun2;
repedtfazék AddNoun;
repedtfazék:repedtfazek AddNoun2;
ruhaderék AddNoun;
ruhaderék:ruhaderek AddNoun2;
rézfazék AddNoun;
rézfazék:rézfazek AddNoun2;
sajtfazék AddNoun;
sajtfazék:sajtfazek AddNoun2;
selyemderék AddNoun;
selyemderék:selyemderek AddNoun2;
szalagderék AddNoun;
szalagderék:szalagderek AddNoun2;
szekérderék AddNoun;
szekérderék:szekérderek AddNoun2;
szentfazék AddNoun;
szentfazék:szentfazek AddNoun2;
szexfazék AddNoun;
szexfazék:szexfazek AddNoun2;
szilfaderék AddNoun;
szilfaderék:szilfaderek AddNoun2;
szoknyaderék AddNoun;
szoknyaderék:szoknyaderek AddNoun2;
szálfaderék AddNoun;
szálfaderék:szálfaderek AddNoun2;
tejesfazék AddNoun;
tejesfazék:tejesfazek AddNoun2;
tölgyderék AddNoun;
tölgyderék:tölgyderek AddNoun2;
tölgyfaderék AddNoun;
tölgyfaderék:tölgyfaderek AddNoun2;
tűzfazék AddNoun;
tűzfazék:tűzfazek AddNoun2;
vasderék AddNoun;
vasderék:vasderek AddNoun2;
vasfazék AddNoun;
vasfazék:vasfazek AddNoun2;
viaszfazék AddNoun;
viaszfazék:viaszfazek AddNoun2;
vállderék AddNoun;
vállderék:vállderek AddNoun2;
ércderék AddNoun;
ércderék:ércderek AddNoun2;
őzderék AddNoun;
őzderék:őzderek AddNoun2;


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen1;

LEXICON AddNoun2
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Case2;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                    Gen1;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Gen;
			  Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
			  Gen;

LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
			  Gen1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case2
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
